Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-1302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Medical Debt Relief Act:

(1) Bad debt expense means the cost of care for which a health care provider expected payment from the patient or a third-party payor, but which the health care provider subsequently determines to be uncollectible;

(2) Eligible resident means an individual eligible for relief who:

(a) Is a resident of the State of Nebraska; and

(b) Has a household income at or below four hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines or has medical debt equal to five percent or more of the individual's household income;

(3) Health care provider means:

(a) A facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act; and

(b) A health care professional licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(4) Medical debt means an obligation to pay money arising from the receipt of health care services;

(5) Medical debt relief means the discharge of a patient's medical debt;

(6) Medical debt relief coordinator means a person, company, partnership, or other entity that is able to discharge medical debt of an eligible resident in a manner that does not result in taxable income for the eligible resident; and

(7) Program means the Medical Debt Relief Program established in section 45-1303.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 44.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.